Maine, session 132, LD1992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1905 is enacted to read:
§1905. Withdrawal
The residents of a participating municipality of a municipal school unit within a school
union may petition and vote to withdraw from the school union in the same manner as a
single municipality within a school administrative unit may petition to withdraw from a
regional school unit in accordance with section 1466.
Page 1 - 132LR2621(03)